test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-gaollek_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - gållek: # N_ODD_WG
    gållek+N+Sg+Nom: gållek
    gållek+N+Sg+Gen: gållega
    gållek+N+Sg+Acc: gållegav
    gållek+N+Sg+Ill: gållegij
    gållek+N+Sg+Ine: gållegin
    gållek+N+Sg+Ela: [gållegist, gållegis]
    gållek+N+Sg+Com: gållegijn
    gållek+N+Pl+Nom: gållega
    gållek+N+Pl+Gen: gållegij
    gållek+N+Pl+Acc: gållegijd
    gållek+N+Pl+Ill: gållegijda
    gållek+N+Pl+Ine: gållegijn
    gållek+N+Pl+Ela: [gållegijst, gållegijs]
    gållek+N+Pl+Com: [gållegij, gållegijgum]
    gållek+N+Ess: gållegin
    gållek+N+Abe: gållegahtá

 
 
